tools/nvda/louis/tables/malayalam.cti
always	\x0D2F\x0D4D	4-13456	# MALAYALAM LETTER YA
always	\x0D30\x0D4D	4-1235	# MALAYALAM LETTER RA
noback always	\x0D31\x0D4D	4-12456	# MALAYALAM LETTER RRA
noback always	\x0D32\x0D4D	4-123	# MALAYALAM LETTER LA
noback always	\x0D33\x0D4D	4-456	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLA
always \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33	4-456-456	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLA
always	\x0D34\x0D4D	4-12356	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLLA= ZHA
always	\x0D35\x0D4D	4-1236	# MALAYALAM LETTER VA
always	\x0D36\x0D4D	4-146	# MALAYALAM LETTER SHA= SOFT SHA
always	\x0D37\x0D4D	4-12346	# MALAYALAM LETTER SSA= SHA
always	\x0D38\x0D4D	4-234	# MALAYALAM LETTER SA
always	\x0D39\x0D4D	4-125	# MALAYALAM LETTER HA

always	\x0D44\x0D4D	4-6-1235	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
always	\x0D60\x0D4D	4-6-1235	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC RR
always	\x0D61\x0D4D	4-6-123	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC LL
always	\x0D62\x0D4D	4-5-123	 # MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC L
always	\x0D63\x0D4D	4-6-123 	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL

# Chillus at end of word
endword	\x0D7B	4-1345				# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU N
endword	\x0D7B\x003A	4-1345-25	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU N PLUS COLON
endword	\x0D7D	4-123				# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU L
endword	\x0D7E	4-456				# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU LL

# When 4-123 is back-translated as Chillu L
always \x0D7D\x0D15	4-123-13
always \x0D7D\x0D28	4-123-1345
always \x0D7D\x0D30	4-123-1235
always \x0D7D\x0D35	4-123-1236
always \x0D7D\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D7D	4-123-4-13-13-4-123
always \x0D7D\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D42	4-123-4-13-13-1256
always \x0D7D\x0D24\x0D4D	4-123-4-2345
always \x0D7D\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D35 4-123-4-13-13-345-1236

# When 4-123 is back-translated as LA plus chandrakkala
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D4D	4-123-4-13
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D17	4-123-1245
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D2A	4-123-1234
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D2F	4-123-13456
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32	4-123-123
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D47 4-123-13-15
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D2B	4-123-235
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D2A\x0D4D 4-123-13-4-1234
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D41 4-123-13-136
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D2E 4-123-134
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3F 4-123-13-24

# When 4-1345 is back-translated as Chillu N
always \x0D7B\x0D38\x0D4D	4-1345-4-234
always \x0D7B\x0D15\x0D42	4-1345-13-1256
always \x0D7B\x0D15\x0D40	4-1345-13-35
always \x0D7B\x0D35\x0D47\x0D23\x0D4D 4-1345-1236-15-4-3456
always \x0D7B\x0D35\x0D3E	4-1345-1236-345
always \x0D7B\x0D31\x0D47	4-1345-12456-15
always \x0D7B\x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D32 4-1345-1234-135-123
always \x0D7B\x0D24\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 4-1345-2345-4-1345-1345
always \x0D7B\x0D28\x0D26 4-1345-1345-145
always \x0D7B\x0D28\x0D41\x0D31 4-1345-1345-136-12456
always \x0D7B\x0D35\x0D34 4-1345-1236-12356
always \x0D7B\x0D1A 4-1345-14

# When 4-3456 is back-translated as Chillu NN
always \x0D7A\x0D15	4-3456-13
always \x0D7A\x0D2E 4-3456-134

# When 4-12456 is back-translated RRA plus chandrakkala
always \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31 4-12456-12456

# If following letter combination appears in middle of word.
always \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D	4-2345-2345-3

# To ensure 25 isn't considered colon in back-translation
always \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E 4-25-25

# For successful back-translation of dot 6 as visarga
always \x0D03\x0D1B 6-16
always \x0D03\x0D16 6-46


# when letter RA is changed to RRA
always	\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D30	4-13-12456
always	\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D30	4-23456-12456
always	\x0D21\x0D4D\x0D30	4-1246-12456
always	\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D30	4-2345-12456
always	\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30	4-1234-12456
always	\x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D30	4-12-12456
always	\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D30	4-134-12456
always	\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D30	4-146-12456
always	\x0D38\x0D4D\x0D30	4-234-12456

# when MA is changed to NA
always  \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A	4-1345-1234
endword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4D	4-1345-1234-3

# when MA is changed to NA and RA is changed to RRA 
always	\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30	4-1345-4-1234-12456

# when NGA is changed to NA
always \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D15	4-1345-13

# Contractions
prfword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D47\x0D3E 4-123-123-135
always \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37\x0D4D 4-12345 #ksha
always \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1E 156 #gya
always \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37 12345 #ksha

# 45-1235 back-translated as ® only when standing alone
word \x00AE 45-1235
partword \x0D2D\x0D30 45-1235

# Back-translate correctly words containing Zero Width Joiner
always \x0D2F\x0D4D\x200D\x0D35 4-13456-1236

#consonent followed by vowel but not matra

attribute MalayalamVowel \x0D07\x0D08\x0D09\x0D0A\x0D0B\x0D0C\x0D0E\x0D0F\x0D10\x0D12\x0D13\x0D14
attribute Halant \x0D4D

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D15 	  13-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER KA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D16 	  46-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER KHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D17 	  1245-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER GA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D18 	  126-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER GHA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1A 	  14-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER CA= CHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1B 	  16-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHA= CHHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1C 	  245-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER JA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1D  356-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER JHA
	
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1F   23456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER TTA= TA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D20 	  2456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER TTHA= TTA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D21 	  1246-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER DDA= HARD DA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D22 	  123456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER DDHA= HARD DDA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D23 	  3456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER NNA= HARD NA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D24 	  2345-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER TA= THA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D25 	  1456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER THA= TTHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D26 	  145-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER DA= SOFT DA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D27 	  2346-1 # MALAYALAM LETTER DHA= SOFT DDA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D28 	  1345-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER NA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2A 	  1234-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER PA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2B 	  235-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER PHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2C 	  12-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER BA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2D 	  45-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER BHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2E 	  134-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER MA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2F 	  13456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER YA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D30 	  1235-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER RA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D31 	  12456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER RRA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D32 	  123-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER LA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D33 	  456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D34 	  12356-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLLA= ZHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D35 	  1236-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER VA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D36 	  146-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER SHA= SOFT SHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D37 	  12346-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER SSA= SHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D38 	  234-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER SA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D39 	  125-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER HA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D44 	  6-1235-1	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D60 	  6-1235-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC RR
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D61 	  6-123-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC LL
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D62 	  5-123-1	  # MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC L
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D63 	  6-123-1 	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL
